District of Columbia statutes.
31-4449

Merger or consolidation — Approval by shareholders.

(a)

The plan of merger or of consolidation shall be approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of two thirds of the voting outstanding shares of each company unless 2 or more classes of shares have been issued for any of the companies.

(b)

If the company has issued 2 or more classes of shares, the plan of merger or of consolidation shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two thirds of the voting outstanding shares of each class.

(c)

For a mutual company, each member or policyholder entitled to vote shall have 1 vote, regardless of the amount of insurance or number of policies held by the individual.

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. III, § 48
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(c), 32 DCR 39
Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-90, § 11, 42 DCR 7155
This section is referenced in § 31-4450.
1981 Ed., § 35-646.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 11 of the Insurance Omnibus Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-97, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3844).